Maryland, session 2026, HB0224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Human Services
5–324.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COVERED BENEFITS” MEANS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0224*

HOUSE BILL 224
(I) THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM;
(II) TEMPORARY CASH ASSISTANCE; AND
(III) THE MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(3) “DEPARTMENTS” MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES,
AND THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND REENTRY AND
REINTEGRATION SUPPORT PROGRAM.
(5) “RELEASING INSTITUTION” MEANS A STATE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY OPERATED BY OR UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(6) “RETURNING CITIZEN” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL CONFINED IN A
STATE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY WHO IS EXPECTED TO BE RELEASED WITHIN 90
DAYS.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENTS JOINTLY SHALL ESTABLISH AND ADMINISTER
THE MARYLAND REENTRY AND REINTEGRATION SUPPORT PROGRAM.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE COORDINATED PRERELEASE
COVERED BENEFITS APPLICATION ASSISTANCE TO RETURNING CITIZENS WHO
CHOOSE TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE A VOLUNTARY AND
STANDARDIZED PRERELEASE APPLICATION PROCESS FOR COVERED BENEFITS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENTS JOINTLY SHALL DEVELOP A PROCESS TO
PROVIDE A RETURNING CITIZEN WITH THE OPPORTUNITY TO APPLY FOR COVERED
BENEFITS BEFORE THE RETURNING CITIZEN’S SCHEDULED RELEASE DATE.
(3) PROGRAM STAFF WITHIN THE RELEASING INSTITUTION SHALL
ASSIST A PARTICIPATING RETURNING CITIZEN IN COMPLETING AND SUBMITTING
ALL NECESSARY APPLICATIONS AND DOCUMENTATION FOR COVERED BENEFITS.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES SHALL ASSIST EACH PARTICIPATING RETURNING CITIZEN IN APPLYING
FOR COVERED BENEFITS AND OBTAINING REQUIRED VERIFICATIONS AT NO COST TO
THE INDIVIDUAL.

HOUSE BILL 224 3
(2) REQUIRED VERIFICATIONS INCLUDE:
(I) A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE RETURNING CITIZEN’S BIRTH
CERTIFICATE;
(II) A COPY OF THE RETURNING CITIZEN’S SOCIAL SECURITY
CARD;
(III) PROOF OF THE RETURNING CITIZEN’S INCOME AND ASSETS;
(IV) PROOF OF THE RETURNING CITIZEN’S SHELTER COSTS; AND
(V) OTHER INFORMATION NECESSARY TO ESTABLISH
ELIGIBILITY FOR BENEFITS.
(3) ASSISTANCE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED IN A
TIMELY MANNER TO ENSURE, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THAT THE RETURNING
CITIZEN POSSESSES THE REQUIRED VERIFICATIONS ON RELEASE FROM A STATE
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENTS JOINTLY
SHALL DEVELOP AND ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING SHALL ESTABLISH A
SECURE DATA SHARING PROCESS TO:
(I) FACILITATE THE TIMELY PROCESSING OF APPLICATIONS
FOR COVERED BENEFITS;
(II) VERIFY A RETURNING CITIZEN’S IDENTITY AND
ELIGIBILITY; AND
(III) ENSURE THAT, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, COVERED
BENEFITS ARE ACTIVE AND ACCESSIBLE TO THE RETURNING CITIZEN IMMEDIATELY
ON RELEASE.
(3) DATA SHARED BETWEEN THE DEPARTMENTS UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE USED SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSES OF ADMINISTERING THE
PROGRAM AND SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS.

HOUSE BILL 224
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.